Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-490
Closed season.

No person shall hunt any upland game birds and mallard ducks upon such breeding and controlled shooting area except between September 1 and April 15 of each year, except that turkeys may be hunted throughout the open season and dog training or dog trial activities may be permitted as prescribed by rules and regulations of the commission or commission orders.

Laws 1957, c. 152, § 7, p. 494;

Laws 1967, c. 224, § 1, p. 599;

Laws 1987, LB 206, § 3;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-907;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 200;

Laws 2011, LB41, § 21;

Laws 2013, LB499, § 8;

Laws 2016, LB745, § 17.